Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.020

Commission composition.

The commission shall be composed of producers and at least one dealer. The director shall be a voting member of the commission.

As used in this chapter, "director" means the director of agriculture or his or her authorized representative.

[ 2012 c 107 s 2; 2008 c 12 s 1; 2003 c 396 s 24; 2002 c 313 s 89; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 136 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 44 s 2; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.020. Prior: 1959 c 163 s 2; prior: (i) 1939 c 219 s 3, part; RRS s 6266-3, part. (ii) 1939 c 219 s 4, part; RRS s 6266-4, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 238: See note following RCW 15.44.010.